Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6202.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND
CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 36
MORATORIUM ON NET METERING, LONG-TERM CONTRACTS AND SUBSIDIES FOR
HEAT PUMPS
39-36-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Heat pump” means any device that transfers heat using mechanical energy;
(2) “Long-term contract” means any contract in excess of five (5) years;
(3) “Net metering” means using electrical energy generated by an eligible net-metering
system for the purpose of self-supplying electrical energy and power at the eligible net-metering
system site;
(4) “Solar energy” means a form of renewable energy that harnesses the power of the sun
to generate electricity;
(5) “Wind energy” means a form of renewable energy that harnesses the power of the wind
to generate electricity.
39-36-2. Moratorium related to net metering, long-term contracts and subsidies.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws to the contrary including, but

not limited to, chapter 26.4 of title 39, any right to renew or enter into any net metering contracts
that are regulated by state law and no customer sited and/or grid-connected power generated energy
contracts shall be permitted under any provision of the general laws.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws to the contrary, including, but
not limited to the provisions of chapter 26.1 of title 39, the State of Rhode Island is hereby
prohibited from entering into any long-term contracts for the purchasing of solar or wind energy
with any energy provider.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws to the contrary, including, but
not limited to, the provisions of chapter 27 of title 39, and notwithstanding any program utilized by
the office of energy resources for the State of Rhode Island, no state funds shall be used to subsidize
the purchase or installation of heat pumps provided by any utility or governmental agency.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002549
========
LC002549 - Page 2 of 3